Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4462.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [16A.402] CASH TRANSACTION ROUNDING. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Authorization to round cash transactions. new text end new text begin (a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, an agency entering into any transaction with a person that results in a payment or transfer of cash between the parties to the transaction may round the payment in the following manner: new text end new text begin (1) in any case in which the total transaction amount ends with one cent, two cents, six cents, or seven cents as the final digit, the amount of cents in the sum shall be rounded down to the nearest amount divisible by five; new text end new text begin (2) in any case in which the total transaction amount ends with three cents, four cents, eight cents, or nine cents as the final digit, the amount of cents in the sum shall be rounded up to the nearest amount divisible by five; and new text end new text begin (3) notwithstanding clause (1), transactions in which the transaction total is $0.01 or $0.02 shall be rounded up to $0.05. new text end new text begin (b) A party authorized to engage in a transaction on behalf of an agency may round the payment in the manner directed by the agency consistent with this section. new text end new text begin (c) This section does not apply to a transaction for which payment is made by electronic fund transfer, check, gift card, money order, credit card, or other similar instrument or method. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Policy posted. new text end new text begin An agency that engages in cash transactions must establish a policy for rounding cash transactions consistent with this section and post the policy at each location where cash transactions occur. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 16B.97, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Duties. (a) The commissioner shall: (1) create general grants management policies and procedures that are applicable to all executive agencies. The commissioner may approve exceptions to these policies and procedures for particular grant programs. Exceptions shall expire or be renewed after five years. new text begin The commissioner must report each approved exception to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over the agency.new text end Executive agencies shall retain management of individual grants programs; (2) provide a central point of contact concerning statewide grants management policies and procedures; (3) serve as a resource to executive agencies in such areas as training, evaluation, collaboration, and best practices in grants management; (4) ensure grants management needs are considered in the development, upgrade, and use of statewide administrative systems and leverage existing technology wherever possible; (5) oversee and approve future professional and technical service contracts and other information technology spending related to executive agency grants management systems and activities; (6) provide a central point of contact for comments about executive agencies violating statewide grants governance policies and about fraud and deleted text begin wastedeleted text end new text begin misusenew text end in grants processes; (7) forward received comments to the appropriate agency for further action, and may follow up as necessary; (8) provide a single listing of all available executive agency competitive grant opportunities and resulting grant recipients; (9) selectively review development and implementation of executive agency grants, policies, and practices; deleted text begin anddeleted text end (10) selectively review executive agency compliance with best practicesdeleted text begin .deleted text end new text begin ; andnew text end new text begin (11) provide a standard template summary page for requests for proposals (RFP) that represent key information about the grant opportunity in a clear and accessible format. The template must include information regarding the purpose of the program, applicant eligibility, funding availability and award structure, grant administration requirements, and the application process. The summary page does not replace or supersede any specific requirement in the full RFP. new text end (b) The commissioner may determine that it is cost-effective for agencies to develop and use shared grants management technology systems. This system would be governed under section 16E.01, subdivision 3, paragraph (b).